Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2340.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 331.301, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 30. a. For purposes of this subsection, âbattery-charged security alarm systemâ means an outdoor alarm system that does all of the following: (1) Interfaces with an alarm system in a manner that enables the outdoor alarm system to cause the connected alarm system to transmit a signal intended to alert the business and a monitoring station operator in response to a burglary or attempted burglary. (2) Is energized by a commercial storage battery not exceeding twelve volts direct current and designed to periodically deliver voltage impulses to the outdoor alarm system. Senate File 2340, p. 2 (3) Includes a battery-charging device used exclusively to charge the battery. b. A county shall not consider a battery-charged security alarm system to be a fence or to be subject to regulation by fence codes, and shall not require a fence permit for the installation or use of a battery-charged security alarm system on property that is not used exclusively for residential purposes. c. A county shall not adopt, enforce, or apply any ordinance, building code, zoning regulation, or other requirement that prohibits or otherwise regulates the installation or use of a battery-charged security alarm system on nonresidential property, provided that the battery-charged security alarm system complies with all of the following requirements: (1) The energizer is certified to meet the current international electrotechnical commission standard 60335-2-76, or a successor standard. (2) The battery-charged security alarm system is located behind a nonelectric perimeter fence or wall that is not less than five feet in height. (3) The battery-charged security alarm system is the greater of ten feet in height or two feet higher than the nonelectric perimeter fence or wall. (4) Warning signs, in capitalized type, reading âWARNING ââ ELECTRIC FENCEâ or similar language, are posted at intervals not greater than thirty feet along the fence. d. This subsection does not apply to property used exclusively for residential occupancy. e. Notwithstanding paragraph âcâ , a county may only require an alarm system operator license or permit for battery-charged security alarm systems in the same manner as is required for any other security alarm systems. f. Nothing in this section shall be construed to apply to security alarm systems that do not meet the definition of âbattery-charged security alarm systemâ . Sec. 2. Section 364.3, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 24. a. For purposes of this subsection, Senate File 2340, p. 3 âbattery-charged security alarm systemâ means an outdoor alarm system that does all of the following: (1) Interfaces with an alarm system in a manner that causes the connected outdoor alarm system to transmit a signal intended to alert the business and a monitoring station operator in response to a burglary or attempted burglary. (2) Is energized by a commercial storage battery not exceeding twelve volts direct current and designed to periodically deliver voltage impulses to the outdoor alarm system. (3) Includes a battery-charging device used exclusively to charge the battery. b. A city shall not consider a battery-charged security alarm system to be a fence or to be subject to regulation by fence codes, and shall not require a fence permit for the installation or use of a battery-charged security alarm system on property that is not used exclusively for residential purposes. c. A city shall not adopt, enforce, or apply any ordinance, building code, zoning regulation, or other requirement that prohibits or otherwise regulates the installation or use of a battery-charged security alarm system on nonresidential property, provided that the system complies with all of the following requirements: (1) The energizer is certified to meet the current international electrotechnical commission standard 60335-2-76, or a successor standard. (2) The battery-charged security alarm system is located behind a nonelectric perimeter fence or wall that is not less than five feet in height. (3) The battery-charged security alarm system is the greater of ten feet in height or two feet higher than the nonelectric perimeter fence or wall. (4) Warning signs, in capitalized type, reading âWARNING ââ ELECTRIC FENCEâ or substantially similar language are posted at intervals not greater than thirty feet along the fence. d. This subsection does not apply to property used exclusively for residential purposes. e. Notwithstanding paragraph âcâ , a city may only require Senate File 2340, p. 4 an alarm system operator license or permit for battery-charged security alarm systems in the same manner as is required for any other security alarm systems. f. Nothing in this section shall be construed to apply to security alarm systems that do not meet the definition of âbattery-charged security alarm systemâ . ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 2340, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor